Utah statutes.
19-6-418.   Recovery of costs by director.

(1)  The director may recover:

(a)  from a responsible party the proportionate share of costs the party is responsible for as determined under Section 19-6-424.5;

(b)  any amount required to be paid by the owner under this part which the owner has not paid; and

(c)  costs of collecting the amounts in Subsections (1)(a) and (1)(b).

(2)  The director may pursue an action or recover costs from any other person if that person caused or substantially contributed to the release.

(3)  All costs recovered under this section shall be deposited in the Petroleum Storage Tank Cleanup Fund created in Section 19-6-405.7.



Amended by Chapter 360, 2012 General Session

